Wisconsin, session 2025, AB883.
do enact as follows:AB883,13Section 1. 86.107 of the statutes is created to read:AB883,1,4486.107 Automatic registration plate reader ban. (1) In this section:AB883,1,75(a) “Automatic registration plate reader” means a device that has the capacity 6to capture an image from a registration plate and convert the image into computer-7readable data.AB883,2,21(b) “Registration plate” means a plate specified under s. 341.12 or under a 2similar law of another state.AB883,2,43(2) No person may use an automatic registration plate reader except under 4any of the following circumstances:AB883,2,65(a) The automatic registration plate reader is used by a parking enforcement 6facility to regulate the use of the parking facility.AB883,2,107(b) The automatic registration plate reader is being used to control access to 8an area if the area is enclosed by clear boundaries, access to the area is limited and 9not open to the public, and entry to the area is through only specific access-control 10points.AB883,2,1411(c) The automatic registration plate reader is installed at an entrance at a 12weigh station facility and is being used by a state or local governmental agency to 13electronically verify registration, logs, or other compliance data or to provide more 14efficient movement of commercial vehicles on a state highway.AB883,2,1615(3) Data captured under sub. (2) may not be shared except for a purpose listed 16under sub. (2) and may not be preserved for more than 90 days.AB883,2,1717